Mississippi statutes. Title 29. Public Lands, Buildings and Property
In General
§ 29-1-107.
Leasing or renting of surface and submerged lands.

The Secretary of State with the approval of the Governor shall, as far as practicable, rent or lease all lands belonging to the state, except as otherwise provided by law for a period of not exceeding one (1) year, and account for the rents therefrom in the same manner as money received from the sale of state lands, provided that no state land shall be rented or leased to individuals, corporations, partnerships, or association of persons for hunting or fishing purposes. Property belonging to the state in municipalities, even though it may have been subdivided into lots, blocks, divisions, or otherwise escheated or was sold to the state by such description, may likewise be leased or rented by the Secretary of State under the terms provided above for other state lands, and the rents accounted for in the same manner. The state shall have all the liens, rights and remedies accorded to landlords in Sections 89-7-1 through 89-7-125; said leases and rental contracts shall automatically terminate on the date provided in said leases or contracts.

The Secretary of State, with the approval of the Governor, may rent or lease surface lands, tidelands or submerged lands owned or controlled by the State of Mississippi lying in or adjacent to the Mississippi Sound or Gulf of Mexico or streams emptying therein, for a period not exceeding forty (40) years for rental payable to the state annually. However, the term of any lease of state public trust tidelands to a person possessing a license under the Mississippi Gaming Control Act shall be governed by the provisions of subsection (4) of this section.

The lessee under such agreement may construct such necessary items for marking channels, docking, wharfing, mooring or fleeting vessels which shall be in aid of navigation and not obstructions thereto.

A lessee of record may be given the option to renew for an additional period not to exceed twenty-five (25) years; however, the term of a renewal for a lease of state public trust tidelands to a person possessing a gaming license under the Mississippi Gaming Control Act shall be governed by the provisions of subsection (4) of this section. The holder of a lease of public trust tidelands, at the expiration thereof, shall have a prior right, exclusive of all other persons, to re-lease as may be agreed upon between the holder of the lease and the Secretary of State.

Leases shall provide for review and rent adjustments at each fifth anniversary tied either to the All Urban Consumer Price Index-All Items (CPI) or to an appraisal which deducts the value of any improvements by the lessee which substantially enhance the value of the land. In the case where the initial rental was based on the value set by the ad valorem tax rolls, then the rent review and adjustment clause shall be likewise based on the value set by such tax rolls. In the event that the lessor and lessee cannot agree on a rental amount, the lease may be cancelled at the option of the lessor. The lessee shall, within thirty (30) days after execution of a sublease or assignment, file a copy thereof, including the total consideration therefor, with the Secretary of State. This paragraph shall not apply to a lease of state public trust tidelands or submerged lands to a person possessing a gaming license under the Mississippi Gaming Control Act who operates a gaming establishment on such tidelands.

Provided, however, the current occupants of public trust tidelands that were developed after the determinable mean high-water line nearest the effective date of the Coastal Wetlands Protection Law shall pay an annual rental based on the fair market value as determined by the assessed valuation of the property. The holder of a lease of public trust tidelands, at the expiration thereof, shall have a prior right, exclusive of all other persons, to re-lease as may be agreed upon between the holder of the lease and the Secretary of State.

This section shall apply to any person possessing a license under the Mississippi Gaming Control Act who operates a gaming establishment in any of the three (3) most southern counties of the state.

The following shall apply to all leases of state public trust tidelands executed by such a licensee:

Every lease executed after August 29, 2005, shall be for a period of thirty (30) years for rental payable to the state annually.

By operation of this section, any lease executed before August 29, 2005, may, at the option of the lessee, either remain at the term stated in the original execution of the lease or be converted to a thirty-year term lease, beginning on such date after August 29, 2005, that the lessee either resumes or begins permanent gaming activities as approved by the Mississippi Gaming Commission, and the lessee shall be required to comply with all other provisions of the lease. Should the lessee choose to operate in a structure that is not on state public trust tidelands and that is on property contiguous to tidelands leased by the lessee, the lessee shall be required to comply with all other provisions of the lease and shall be exempt from the assessment provided for in paragraph (c) of this subsection. Easements for and rights-of-way for public streets and highways shall not be construed to interrupt the contiguous nature of a parcel of property. In the event that a lessee does not elect either to remain bound by the original term of the lease or to convert the lease to a thirty-year term, the Secretary of State may lease the state public trust tidelands that are the subject of the lease to any other person or entity.

Leases shall provide for review and rent adjustments at each annual anniversary tied to the All Urban Consumer Price Index-All Items (CPI). In the case of the renewal of a lease after the expiration of the original thirty-year term under this subsection, each renewal shall be for a term of thirty (30) years. The base rate to which the CPI shall apply for purposes of executing the subsequent lease shall be negotiated by the lessee with the Secretary of State.

(i) Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, any person possessing a license under the Mississippi Gaming Control Act who does not lease public trust tidelands from the state or any of its political subdivisions, and who operates a gaming establishment in any of the three (3) most southern counties of the state, shall pay an annual in-lieu tidelands assessment to the Public Trust Tidelands Assessments Fund (hereinafter referred to as “fund”) created in Section 29-15-10, in the amount and manner provided for in this paragraph.

For calendar year 2006, the annual in-lieu tidelands assessment paid by the licensee to the fund shall be:

1. Four Hundred Thousand Dollars ($400,000.00), if the capital investment in the part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted is Fifty Million Dollars ($50,000,000.00) or less.

2. Four Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($450,000.00), if the capital investment in the part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted is equal to or more than Fifty Million Dollars ($50,000,000.00) but less than Sixty Million Dollars ($60,000,000.00).

3. Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00), if the capital investment in the part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted is equal to or more than Sixty Million Dollars ($60,000,000.00) but less than Seventy-five Million Dollars ($75,000,000.00).

4. Six Hundred Thousand Dollars ($600,000.00), if the capital investment in the part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted is equal to or more than Seventy-five Million Dollars ($75,000,000.00) but less than One Hundred Million Dollars ($100,000,000.00).

5. Seven Hundred Thousand Dollars ($700,000.00), if the capital investment in the part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted is equal to or more than One Hundred Million Dollars ($100,000,000.00) but less than One Hundred Twenty-five Million Dollars ($125,000,000.00).

6. Seven Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($750,000.00), if the capital investment in the part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted is equal to or more than One Hundred Twenty-five Million Dollars ($125,000,000.00).

For each calendar year thereafter, the Secretary of State shall review and adjust the value of the capital investment and the annual in-lieu tidelands assessment due. Such review and adjustment shall be tied to the CPI.

This paragraph shall not apply to a gaming licensee if the licensee conducts gaming in a structure that is located on property that is leased from the Mississippi State Port at Gulfport or any political subdivision of the state, or to a licensee who conducts gaming in a structure that is located on property that is leased to the licensee jointly by the State of Mississippi and the City of Biloxi; however, with regard to property owned by a political subdivision of the state, this exception shall only apply to property owned by the political subdivision on August 29, 2005, if legal gaming could have been conducted on such property on that date.

This paragraph shall not apply to a gaming licensee if the licensee conducts gaming in a structure that is located on property that is not leased from the State of Mississippi and/or a political subdivision of the State of Mississippi and is not on state public trust tidelands, and if the licensee conducted gaming on that property before August 29, 2005.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 454; Laws, 1989, ch. 495, § 8; Laws, 2005, 5th Ex Sess, ch. 15, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Oct. 17, 2005).

§ 29-1-109.
Fees or commissions prohibited for collecting rent on state-owned property.

It shall be unlawful for any officer or employee of the State of Mississippi or any department, institution, or agency thereof to pay or authorize the payment of any fee, commission, or compensation whatsoever to any person for the collection of rents arising from any property owned by the State of Mississippi or any department, institution, or agency thereof. Any person who shall pay or authorize the payment of any such fees, commissions, or compensation shall be civilly liable to the State of Mississippi in double the amount of the fees, commissions, or other compensation so paid.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4095.5; Laws, 1950, ch. 558.

§ 29-1-111.
Duplicate of conveyance issued.

When any conveyance or any release upon redemption made by the auditor or the land commissioner shall be lost or destroyed, upon the application of the person interested, the land commissioner may make another conveyance or release of the same land to the person to whom the first was made. The latter shall be in lieu of the former, shall be marked “duplicate,” and shall have the same effect.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3858; 1906, § 2938; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5273; 1930, § 6050; 1942, § 4148.

§ 29-1-113.
Presumption of patent in absence of record.

Whenever a sale of land for delinquent taxes to the state has been certified to the state land commissioner for more than twenty-five (25) years and there is no record in the land commissioner’s office of said lands having been patented out of the state, there shall arise a presumption that said land has been duly patented out of the state. The land commissioner, with the consent of the attorney general, upon application of anyone claiming title to said land and upon his furnishing proof that the taxes to the state and county have been paid on said land for each year for the past ten (10) years, is hereby authorized to strike said sale, which striking shall be a disclaimer of all right, title, or interest which the State of Mississippi has in such lands.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4148.5; Laws, 1948, ch. 491; Laws, 1950, ch. 314.

§ 29-1-115.
Presumption of validity of patents of forfeited tax land.

Whenever any forfeited tax land patent has been issued by the state for a period of at least ten (10) years, and the patentee has paid into the state treasury the price fixed by the land commissioner, and all taxes accruing and payable upon the land described in such patent subsequent to the issuance thereof have been paid, it shall be presumed that in the procurement of such patent the patentee paid a valid, legal, and adequate consideration therefor, complied with all the requirements of law, and practiced no fraud upon the state, and that such patent is a valid and legal patent; and said state shall thereafter be forever precluded and estopped from questioning the validity of such patent.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4106.5; Laws, 1950, ch. 323.

§ 29-1-117.
Titles and claims vacated and relinquished.

All apparent title and claims of the State of Mississippi to and for lands on account of their sale for delinquent taxes prior to the sales under the Abatement Act of 1875, now held by the state, are hereby vacated and relinquished, leaving the apparent title in those who would have been the owners of the land had not such sales been made, as was the intent and purpose of said act.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 5285; 1930, § 6049; 1942, § 4147; Laws, 1910, ch. 154.

§ 29-1-119.
Patents to issue in certain cases.

Where the records of the land office or any office in the state show that full payment was made for any of the lands which were described in the act approved March 2, 1875, and which were leased under the authority of said act by the secretary of state on December 18, 1875, for ninety-nine (99) years from that time, the land commissioner, on application of the lessee or persons holding under him and the payment of the fee prescribed for such patents, shall issue to such lessee a patent which shall vest in him or his heirs, devisees, or assigns title for the unexpired time of such lease to such lands as prescribed by said act of March 2, 1875, and shall inure to the person entitled under the said lease, whether he be living or dead.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 2929; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5264; 1930, § 6051; 1942, § 4149; Laws, 1900, ch. 66.

§ 29-1-121.
Agent to collect fund due state.

The Governor may contract with and appoint an agent for the collection of any funds due by the federal government to the State of Mississippi on account of the sale of any land made or hereafter to be made or located or disposed of by the United States, for cash or bounty land warrants or land scrip or certificates of any kind or agricultural college scrip, and to all lands allotted to Indians in severalty, including former and existing Indian, military, or other reservations in said state, and he may allow him such reasonable compensation as may be agreed upon, to be paid only out of funds actually collected by him.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 2928; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5263; 1930, § 6054; 1942, § 4152; Laws, 1896, ch. 49.

§ 29-1-123.
Lists of tax lands prepared; copies to counties.

Immediately after March 26, 1936, it shall be the duty of the land commissioner to prepare or cause to be prepared accurate and complete lists of all lands in each county which have been forfeited to the state for the nonpayment of taxes, the title to which has matured in the state. Such lists shall be prepared for each county separately and embrace and include all lands heretofore sold to the state for delinquent taxes in such county and now held or claimed by the state; and such lists shall be made up in the regular order of townships, ranges, and sections as now appearing on the records of his office. Such lists shall show the date of the tax sale to the state, the amount of taxes, damages, costs, and special assessments of every kind whatsoever for which such lands were sold. No lands heretofore stricken by the land commissioner, with the approval of the Attorney General, from the lists of lands sold to the state for delinquent taxes in his office under the provisions of Section 29-1-31 of the Mississippi Code of 1972 shall be included in the lists of lands to be compiled under the provisions of this section.

Such lists, when completed, shall be examined by the Attorney General; and the land commissioner, with the approval of the Attorney General, shall strike from such lists and from the land book or books in his office all lands which, by reason of insufficient description or other cause, in the opinion of the Attorney General are not the property of the state. The title to the state to such lands as may be thus stricken off shall be thereby relinquished. When such lists shall have been completed, they shall be duly recorded by the land commissioner in a record book provided by him for that purpose in his office, the lists of such lands for each county to be recorded in a separate book, and the land commissioner shall certify to the correctness of such lists as thus recorded.

The land commissioner, after recording in his office such lists of lands sold to the state for delinquent taxes and held or claimed by the state, shall prepare and mail to the chancery clerk of the county in which such lands are situated a certified copy of such lists under the seal of the land office, and the chancery clerk shall record the same in a separate record book in his office provided for that purpose. In counties having two (2) judicial districts, such lists shall be recorded in the office of the chancery clerk of each such judicial district. For recording such lists, the chancery clerk shall be allowed Five Cents (5¢) for each tract of land formerly included as a single assessment embraced in such lists, to be paid out of the county treasury upon allowance of the board of supervisors.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4077; Laws, 1936, ch. 174.

§ 29-1-125.
Collection of sums due state arising from mineral interests.

The State Tax Commission is authorized, empowered, and directed to collect and receive any and all sums of money due the State of Mississippi as royalties or other returns arising as a result of the ownership of tax-forfeited lands, title to which is vested in the state and which lands have not been sold; and the commission is further authorized, empowered and directed to determine the interest of the state in any royalties or other mineral interests due it and accruing or arising from ownership, lease, or otherwise, excepting only lands owned by the state and its institutions which are under the control of a legally constituted board of trustees or other agency having the power to enforce all the rights of the state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4078-01; Laws, 1950, ch. 560, § 1.

§ 29-1-127.
Reports as to mineral interests and payment of royalties and other returns.

It shall be the duty of any and all persons, firms, or corporations having any interest in the lands described in Section 29-1-125, or in minerals produced from said lands, when requested, to report to the State Tax Commission, on forms furnished and prescribed by it, full information with respect to the interest held, claimed, or owned and of any oil, gas, sulphur, or other mineral products which have been produced or transported by such person, firm, or corporation, and all pertinent or necessary information with respect thereto. Such reports shall be made regardless of the kind of title or interest held, whether as tenant, lessee, producer, purchaser, or transporter. All parties or persons shall pay the State Tax Commission, as agent of the state, any royalties or other returns due the state by reason of its ownership of lands or any interest therein, and shall make full and complete disclosure of all pertinent facts with respect to such matters.

Any person responsible for the payment of royalties or other returns and the distribution of royalties or other returns shall make a report on or before the tenth day of each month, on forms prescribed and furnished by the commission, showing for each oil, gas, or sulphur well or any gravel pit or quarry the total quantity of oil, gas, or other minerals produced in the preceding month, the value in money, the name and address of each person receiving or entitled to receive royalties or other returns, the name and address of the person or persons receiving or purchasing the output of the well, pit, or quarry, and other information required by the commission. The report shall show the quantity and value in money of the product which is owned by the state as owner of the title to the land, and shall remit with the report the total amount due the state. Remittance may be by check or bank draft, but this shall not be a discharge of the debt until the state has received the amount in legal tender.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4078-02; Laws, 1950, ch. 560, §§ 2, 3.

§ 29-1-129.
Accounting for and disposition of monies collected or received.

All monies received or collected by the State Tax Commission under Sections 29-1-125 through 29-1-143 shall be separately accounted for and a permanent record made thereof, showing all proper and necessary details as to the source from which collected, the payor, the quantity, kind, and value of products for which paid, and the description of lands from which severed if the state is the owner of the lands, or the royalties; and it shall issue receipts therefor to the person or persons paying the money. All money collected and received shall be deposited in the bank and paid into the general fund of the state on or before the 10th day of the month following the collection.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4078-03; Laws, 1950, ch. 560, § 4.

§ 29-1-131.
Powers and duties of Department of Revenue.

The commission is hereby empowered and authorized to do and require to be done the following things:

Prepare and furnish all necessary forms for use by persons making reports as required by Sections 29-1-125 through 29-1-143; to adopt and issue rules and regulations for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of said sections and for the collection of all sums due the state under the provisions hereof; and to provide for orderly and reasonable procedure for details and for situations which arise from time to time.

To require the state land commissioner to furnish all needed data available in his office.

To require the state oil and gas board to furnish all needed data available in its office.

To require any owner, producer, purchaser, or transporter of any oil, gas, or other minerals to furnish any needed and useful information pertinent to the administration of the cited sections, and in the possession of any such parties; and to require the said persons to furnish monthly reports with respect to current operations.

To require any chancery clerk, or other officer in the state having public records, to furnish copies of any needed and useful information or record in his possession.

Any member of the commission or its authorized agents shall have the authority to examine any book, paper, record, or other data when considered necessary or useful in the administration of the aforesaid sections, and this shall include the right to examine the records of any bank, any common carrier, or any dealer in materials or merchandise commonly used in the severance of oil, gas, or other minerals from land; the commission shall have the right to summon any person as a witness to testify to any pertinent fact; and the commission, through the Attorney General, may have proceedings instituted in the proper court to compel compliance with the foregoing provisions.

Make use of any tax return in its possession, when such return contains information relative to matters connected with the administration of said sections.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4078-04; Laws, 1950, ch. 560, § 5.

§ 29-1-133.
Information to be furnished to State Tax Commission.

The state land commissioner and the state oil and gas board shall furnish, when requested by the commission, a certified copy of any document, record, letter, or other data needed and useful in the administration of Sections 29-1-125 through 29-1-143, and shall give any information that they have with respect to matters in controversy. The state land commissioner shall furnish a list of all state owned lands shown by the records in his office, if the lands are located in a county or in counties adjoining a county in which is located any oil or gas field in the state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4078-05; Laws, 1950, ch. 560, § 6.

§ 29-1-135.
Lien of state.

The state shall have a lien on all oil, gas, or other minerals produced from any land owned by it or in which it has any interest, and this lien shall exist and continue against such oil, gas, or other minerals when in the hands of the first owner after severance, the producer, lessee, or transporter. If any of said parties fail to make provision for the payment of the sums due the state, they shall be personally liable, individually and severally, to the state for all sums lawfully due to it.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4078-06; Laws, 1950, ch. 560, § 7.

§ 29-1-137.
Powers and duties of Attorney General.

The Attorney General of the state shall act as attorney for the commission and shall advise it as to all questions arising in connection with the administration of Sections 29-1-125 through 29-1-143, and as to all matters in controversy. He shall represent the commission in any and all suits at law or equity arising from the administration of said sections, and shall bring suit for the collection of any sum due the state on behalf of the commission, as the agent of the state, in all cases which he believes the conditions warrant suit. He may, if deemed advisable, sue in his own name as the chief law officer of the state. He shall represent the commission in all cases involving the title of lands in question, and on any and all other matters arising from the administration of the cited sections.

The Attorney General may request and direct any district attorney to aid in the trial of any suit in the district which he serves and, when so requested, the district attorney shall assist in the conduct and trial of any suit in his district; but the Attorney General shall prepare all bills, declarations, and pleadings.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4078-07; Laws, 1950, ch. 560, § 8.

§ 29-1-139.
Agents of Department of Revenue.

The commission shall use as its agents any person employed by the commissioner as provided by law, and assigned to and accepted by the commission; and any such persons, when properly authorized, shall have the power to act to the same extent as the commission itself, except as to such matters that require the adoption of a formal order by the commission.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4078-08; Laws, 1950, ch. 560, § 9.

§ 29-1-141.
Interest on unpaid sums.

All due but unpaid and delinquent sums shall bear interest at the rate of one half of one percent (1/2 of 1%) a month from the month in which due until paid, and a fractional month shall be considered a month. Any amount not reported and paid when due shall be increased by a penalty of ten percent (10%) and interest on the principal, as in other cases of nonpayment.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4078-09; Laws, 1950, ch. 560, § 10.

§ 29-1-143.
Jurisdiction of chancery court.

The chancery court shall have jurisdiction of all matters and causes, including suits and appeals from the commission, arising from the administration of Sections 29-1-125 through 29-1-143, except such causes and suits which the constitution gives to the circuit court. All suits in court shall be governed by the established rules of procedure for the court where the suit is maintained. The commission, as the agent of the state, may be made a party defendant as a citizen, and all process for the commission shall be served on its secretary.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4078-10; Laws, 1950, ch. 560, § 11.

§ 29-1-145.
State reimbursement of county or municipality for maintenance costs of land to be sold for unpaid taxes.

The chancery clerk or municipal clerk shall report to the Secretary of State any reasonable costs incurred by the county or municipality in maintaining unredeemed lands sold for taxes while those lands remain unsold. The Secretary of State shall pay the maintenance costs out of the money deposited into the Land Records Maintenance Fund. The Secretary of State shall certify to the Department of Finance and Administration and to the State Treasurer the amount of maintenance costs allowed to the county and municipality, and the Department of Finance and Administration shall issue a warrant in favor of the county or municipality for the amount of those costs. In no event shall the maintenance costs allowed the county or municipality exceed the market value of the lands or the purchase money received from the sale of those lands.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 583, § 1; Laws, 1995, ch. 352, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

§ 29-1-147.
Relinquishment by state of claims for certain forfeited tax lands.

All apparent title and claims of the State of Mississippi to and for lands on account of their sale for delinquent taxes before January 1, 1950, held by the state on January 1, 1995, are hereby vacated and relinquished, leaving apparent title in those who would have been the owners of the land had not such sales been made, or their lawful grantees or assigns, if any, provided said grantees or assigns are now paying and have paid taxes on said property.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 583, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 29-1-149.
Report of transactions for all conveyances of real property.

Each agency, department, community or junior college and public institution of higher learning of the State of Mississippi shall file a report of transactions for all conveyances of real property, whether purchased, sold, leased, donated or acquired as a gift or through the process of eminent domain, to the Department of Finance and Administration Bureau of Buildings, Grounds and Real Property on a basis determined by the department for the filing of such reports. However, reports, at a minimum, shall be filed with the department at least once annually.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2013, ch. 399, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 20, 2013).